Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 2. Clerk

Cross references. —

As to county clerks generally, see §§

18-3-102

through

18-3-112

,

18-3-401

and

18-3-402

.

For rules with respect to district clerks generally, see Rules 77 through 80, W.R.C.P.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Clerks of Court § 1 et seq.

21 C.J.S. Courts § 236 et seq.

§ 5-3-201.
Office created; term; election in counties of first and second class;
county clerk designated ex officio clerk in other counties.

There shall be a clerk
of the district court in each organized county of the state whose
term of office shall be four (4) years and until his successor is
elected and qualified. Clerks of the district court shall be elected
at general elections in counties of the first and second class; and
in all other counties the county clerk shall be ex officio clerk of
the district court, and shall perform all of the duties pertaining
to the office of clerk of the district court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, §§ 1, 3; 1895, ch. 73, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3398; C.S. 1910, § 928; Laws 1915, ch. 40, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1154; R.S. 1931, § 31-222; Laws 1937, ch. 85, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 1-601; W.S. 1957, § 5-52.

Cross references. —

As to election of clerk, see art. 5, § 13, Wyo. Const.

As to election and term of clerks, see §

22-2-105

.

Editor's notes. —

This section is a consolidation of Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, §§ 1 and 3, and Laws 1895, ch. 73, § 1. This consolidation took place in R.S. 1899 and has been ratified by subsequent amendments by the legislature.

§ 5-3-202.
Duties generally.

Each clerk of the district
court shall keep and make up the records and books of the court of
his particular county, receive all cases filed therein, properly record
and attend to the same, and shall have the care and custody of all
the records, seal, books, papers and property pertaining to his said
office or the court of the county for which he is elected and which
may be filed or deposited therein, and shall receive, account for
and pay over all money that may come into the possession of the court
according to law, and under the orders or decrees of the court, except
that which shall be received by master commissioners. He shall keep
all records and files in criminal cases, and attend to all duties
required of the clerk in relation thereto. He shall attend upon the
terms of court held in the county for which he is elected, and perform
such duties relating to his office as may be required of him by the
court, and shall perform all such other duties relating to his office
as are required of him by law or the rules and practice of the courts.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3400; C.S. 1910, § 930; C.S. 1920, § 1156; R.S. 1931, § 31-225; C.S. 1945, § 1-602; W.S. 1957, § 5-53.

Failure to account is no defense to action for salary. —

It is no defense to an action by the clerk for salary that he had failed or refused to account for fees received by him, since there is a separate proceeding provided for compelling such accounting, by enforcement of liability on his official bond. Board of Comm'rs v. Atkinson, 4 Wyo. 334, 33 P. 995,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1893).

Applied

in

Henning v. City of Casper, 63 Wyo. 352, 182 P.2d 840,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1947).

Quoted

in

Blake v. Rupe, 651 P.2d 1096,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

Linde v. Bentley, 482 P.2d 121,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1971).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

§ 5-3-203.
Vacation of office; filling of vacancies.

The office of the clerk
of the district court shall be deemed vacated under the circumstances
provided by W.S.

22-18-101

. Any vacancy in the office of the clerk of the district
court shall be filled as provided by W.S.

22-18-111

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, §§ 3, 11; R.S. 1899, § 3401; C.S. 1910, § 931; C.S. 1920, § 1157; R.S. 1931, § 31-226; C.S. 1945, § 1-603; W.S. 1957, § 5-54; Laws 1987, ch. 4, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, §§ 3 and 11, were consolidated in R.S. 1899.

§ 5-3-204.
Salaries to be paid by county.

The salaries of clerks
of the district courts shall be paid by the county in which they respectively
act, in monthly installments, after services are performed.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 3417; Laws 1901, ch. 76, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 933; C.S. 1920, § 1159; R.S. 1931, § 31-228; C.S. 1945, § 1-604; W.S. 1957, § 5-55.

Cross references. —

As to salary of clerk, see §

18-3-107

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was revised by the 1899 compiler by omitting “in first class counties” following “courts.” The 1899 compiler also omitted a proviso clause excepting counties of the second, third and fourth class and providing that in these counties salaries should be paid quarterly.

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Atkinson, 4 Wyo. 334, 33 P. 995,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1893).

§ 5-3-205.
Collection
of fees in advance; payment to treasurer; liability for collection.

All fees prescribed by statute for civil business, shall be collected in advance by the clerk and except as otherwise provided in this section shall be paid to the treasurer of the county at the end of each month. The clerk shall be liable under his bond for the collection and payment of such fees. The clerk shall remit:

The court automation fee prescribed by W.S. 2-2-401(a)(iii), 5-3-206(a)(i), (vii) and (x),

6-10-102

and

6-10-103

to the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

at the end of each month;

The indigent civil legal services fee prescribed by W.S. 2-2-401(a)(iv), 5-3-206(a)(i), (vii) and (x),

6-10-102

and

6-10-103

to the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

at the end of each month;

The police officer continuing education and training fee prescribed by W.S. 31-5-1201(h) to the account in the enterprise fund under W.S. 9-1-633(n) at the end of each month.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 3418; C.S. 1910, § 934; C.S. 1920, § 1160; R.S. 1931, § 31-229; C.S. 1945, § 1-605; W.S. 1957, § 5-56; Laws 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2018 ch. 117, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, rewrote this section, which formerly read: “All fees prescribed by statute for civil business, shall be collected in advance by the clerk and paid to the treasurer of the county at the end of each month, except that the clerk shall remit the court automation fee prescribed by W.S. 2-2-401(a)(iii), 5-3-206(a)(i), (vii) and (x),

6-10-102

and

6-10-103

to the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

at the end of each month. The clerk shall be liable under his bond for the collection and payment of such fees.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Fees may be required before docketing transferred case. —

Clerk of court to which a cause was transferred on change of venue was not bound to docket case until fees were paid. State ex rel. City of Cheyenne v. District Court, 42 Wyo. 364, 294 P. 779,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(1930).

Collection in advance presumed. —

In embezzlement prosecution against clerk of district court, required to collect fees in advance, it must be presumed the clerk performed such duty. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Sufficient demands for money collected. —

Demand for money due may be made by either county commissioners or treasurer. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Demands by county clerk pursuant to county commissioners' request, held sufficient. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Reports of district court clerk held competent evidence. —

Reports of clerk of the district court, certifying earnings of his office, were competent in embezzlement prosecution. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Evidence making prima facie case reported amounts were collected.
—

Evidence made at least prima facie case that clerk of the district court, charged with embezzlement, actually collected amounts certified by him, for which he gave checks to treasurer. State v. Campbell, 42 Wyo. 252, 293 P. 365,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1930), overruled, Howard v. State, 762 P.2d 28,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Atkinson, 4 Wyo. 334, 33 P. 995,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1893).

§ 5-3-206.
Fees.

For all civil matters filed or commenced, the clerk of each district court shall charge the following fees:

For filing instruments or documents in each civil action and certifying one (1) copy of any order, decree or judgment at the time of its filing for each party, an original filing fee of one hundred twenty dollars ($120.00) which shall be paid by the plaintiff. This fee shall apply to original actions commenced and to actions that are reopened after a final decree previously has been entered. Forty dollars ($40.00) of the filing fee shall be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be for indigent civil legal services and both shall be remitted as provided in W.S.

5-3-205

;

For issuing commission to take deposition, seventy-five cents ($.75);

For taking depositions and the certificate, seal and transmission thereof, five dollars ($5.00);

For taking affidavit or acknowledgment, certifying and sealing same, fifty cents ($.50) for each person;

For each certificate and seal, fifty cents ($.50);

For copying or photostating any record or paper of the clerk’s office when the instrument, record or paper contains one (1) page, one dollar ($1.00), and when more, fifty cents ($.50) for each additional page;

For all transcripts in cases appealed to the supreme court, one hundred dollars ($100.00), including certificates, seals and transmission. Forty dollars ($40.00) of the fee under this paragraph shall be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be for indigent civil legal services and both shall be remitted as provided in W.S.

5-3-205

;

For copies of other documents made by a county operator, fifty cents ($.50) for the first page and twenty-five cents ($.25) for each additional page;

For filing, recording and issuing certificates of intention to become citizens of the United States and for final naturalization, including oath and record, in accordance with the fee schedule of the United States immigration and naturalization service;

For docketing and in payment of clerk’s fee after docketing incident to any appeal or bill of exception from a circuit court, one hundred dollars ($100.00), and for docketing any transcript of judgment from a circuit court upon the judgment and execution dockets, one hundred dollars ($100.00), which amount shall be paid by appellant, or by judgment holder to the clerk at time of docketing. Forty dollars ($40.00) of any fee imposed under this paragraph shall be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be for indigent civil legal services and both shall be remitted as provided in W.S. 5-3-205.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 3419; Laws 1901, ch. 19, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 935; C.S. 1920, § 1161; R.S. 1931, § 31-230; C.S. 1945, § 1-606; Laws 1951, ch. 78, § 1; 1953, ch. 105, § 1; 1955, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-57; Laws 1978, ch. 10, § 1; 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 171, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to fixing fees of court commissioners by court and taxing as costs, see §

5-3-308

.

As to taxation and collection of per diem of court reporter as costs, see §

5-3-410

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(i) and (a)(vii), substituted “seventy dollars ($70.00)” for “sixty dollars ($60.00),” and substituted “shall be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be for indigent civil legal services and both” for “of sixty dollars ($60.00) shall be for court automation and”; and in (a)(x), substituted “forty dollars ($40.00)” for “thirty dollars ($30.00),” substituted “thirty dollars ($30.00)” for “twenty dollars ($20.00),” and substituted “automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be for indigent civil legal services and both” for “automation and.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), substituted “eighty-five dollars ($85.00)” for “seventy dollars ($70.00)” in the first sentence; substituted “Twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “Ten dollars ($10.00) at the beginning of the third sentence; in (a)(vii), substituted “eighty-five dollars ($85.00)” for “seventy dollars ($70.00)” in the first sentence; substituted “Twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “Ten dollars ($10.00)” at the beginning of the second sentence; rewrote (a)(x), which formerly read: “For docketing and in payment of clerk's fee after docketing incident to any appeal or bill of exception from a justice's court, forty dollars ($40.00), and for docketing any transcript of judgment from justice's court upon the judgment and execution dockets, thirty dollars ($30.00), which amount shall be paid by appellant, or by judgment holder to the clerk at time of docketing. Ten dollars ($10.00) of any fee imposed under this paragraph shall be for court automation, ten dollars ($10.00) shall be for indigent civil legal services and both shall be remitted as provided in
W.S.

5-3-205

.”

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(x) substituted “circuit court” for “justice’s court” twice.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both were given effect in the section as set out above

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i), substituted "one hundred ten dollars ($110.00)" for "eighty-five dollars ($85.00)," and "Thirty dollars ($30.00)" for "Twenty-five dollars ($25.00)."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i), substituted “one hundred twenty dollars ($120.00)” for “one hundred ten dollars ($110.00)” and “Forty dollars ($40.00)” for “Thirty dollars ($30.00)”; in (a)(vii) and (a)(x), substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “eighty-five dollars ($85.00)” throughout and “Forty dollars ($40.00)” for “Twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” throughout.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2019, ch. 171 § 2, provides: “The increases in filing fees and other judicial fees as provided in this act shall not apply to any state agency until July 1, 2020.”

“Transcript.”—

District court properly denied a father’s motion for relief from the court clerk’s assessment of an $85 fee because, while the term “transcripts” in the statute at issue, when read in isolation, was susceptible to multiple meanings, the rules of appellate procedure indicated that the transcript mentioned in the statute was not a recordation of testimony, but a record of the proceedings, and the statute required the filing fee even though no transcript of testimony was included in the designated record. MSC, II v. MCG, 2019 WY 59, 442 P.3d 662,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2019).

Fees may be required before docketing transferred case. —

Clerk of court to which a cause was transferred on change of venue was not bound to docket case until fees were paid. State ex rel. City of Cheyenne v. District Court, 42 Wyo. 364, 294 P. 779,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(1930).

Appellate notice filed upon presentation to clerk. —

An appellant's notice of appeal is deemed filed, for purposes of Rule 2.01, W.R.A.P., upon the appellant's presenting the notice for filing to the clerk of the district court and not upon the appellant's payment to the clerk of the transcript fee prescribed by subsection (a)(vii). Jung-Leonczynska v. Steup, 782 P.2d 578,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 5-3-207.
Statement of costs mailed to parties to actions.

If requested by a party
to a case, the clerk of the court shall make up an itemized statement
of the court costs in the case and mail a copy to the requesting party.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 19, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 936; C.S. 1920, § 1162; R.S. 1931, § 31-231; C.S. 1945, § 1-607; W.S. 1957, § 5-58; 2003, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 5-3-208.
Amount of bond; conditions.

Each clerk upon entering
on the duties of his office, shall give a bond in the penal sum of
not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) to the county with
two (2) or more sufficient sureties to be approved by the county commissioners
conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of his office,
the proper collection and turning over all fees and the proper payment
of all moneys collected by him and he shall from time to time give
such additional bond as the judge of the court may require.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 3402; C.S. 1910, § 937; C.S. 1920, § 1163; R.S. 1931, § 31-234; C.S. 1945, § 1-608; W.S. 1957, § 5-59.

Failure to give new bond is no defense to action for salary.
—

Fact that after the qualification of the clerk of the district court one of the sureties on his bond died and he failed to furnish a new bond, though requested by the county board so to do, is no defense to an action for his salary, if there was no declaration by competent authority that the office was vacant, and no steps were taken to oust him from office. Board of Comm'rs v. Atkinson, 4 Wyo. 334, 33 P. 995,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1893).

§ 5-3-209.
Clerk liable on bond for acts of deputies; deputy's bond.

Each clerk shall be liable
upon his official bond for all acts of his deputies, but each clerk
may take from his deputies a bond to himself to indemnify him on account
of the acts of his deputies.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 53, § 10; R.S. 1899, § 3403; C.S. 1910, § 938; C.S. 1920, § 1164; R.S. 1931, § 31-235; C.S. 1945, § 1-609; W.S. 1957, § 5-60.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of clerk of court, or his bond, for default and misfeasance of his assistants or deputies, 71 ALR2d 1140.

§ 5-3-210.
Duty as custodian of seal; seal to be attached to official papers.

The clerk of the district
court shall be custodian of the seal of said court, which seal shall
be kept in the office of the clerk of the district court in the respective
counties and shall be attached to all writs, orders, or other instruments
that the clerk of the district court is now or may hereafter be required
or permitted to sign or certify in his official capacity.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 15, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3429; C.S. 1910, § 4272; C.S. 1920, § 5541; R.S. 1931, § 89-201; C.S. 1945, § 3-201; W.S. 1957, § 5-61.

Cross references. —

As to seal of district court, see §

5-3-110

.

§ 5-3-211.
Books and
records to be kept. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 2347; Laws 1895, ch. 89, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3430; C.S. 1910, § 4273; C.S. 1920, § 5542; R.S. 1931, § 89-202; C.S. 1945, § 3-202; W.S. 1957, § 5-62; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 24, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 5-3-212.
Entries on appearance docket and their effect.

The clerk shall enter
on the appearance docket, at the time of the commencement of an action
or proceeding, the names of the parties in full, with names of counsel,
and forthwith index the case, direct and reverse, in the name of each
plaintiff and defendant. He shall also enter at the time it occurs,
under the case so docketed, the issue of the summons or other mesne
process or order, and the filing of each paper, and he shall note
on the appearance docket the date of issuance, date of service and
how served and date of filing, which will be evidence of such service.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 2348; R.S. 1899, § 3431; C.S. 1910, § 4274; C.S. 1920, § 5543; R.S. 1931, § 89-203; C.S. 1945, § 3-203; W.S. 1957, § 5-63; Laws 1961, ch. 4.

Cited in

CP v. State (In the Interest of NP), 2017 WY 18, 389 P.3d 787,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2017).

§ 5-3-213.
Clerk not to act as attorney.

No clerk of the district
court or county clerk in counties wherein such clerk is ex officio
clerk of the district court, shall accept employment or retainer as
an attorney-at-law or give any advice as such in any action, cause
or proceeding pending in the court, wherein he is such clerk.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 53, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3404; C.S. 1910, § 939; C.S. 1920, § 1165; R.S. 1931, § 31-236; C.S. 1945, § 1-621; W.S. 1957, § 5-64.